Maryland, session 2026, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
TITLE 11C. COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES – LOCAL PROVISIONS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1529*

HOUSE BILL 1529
11C–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMON ELEMENT” MEANS:
(1) ANY PORTION OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OTHER
THAN THE UNITS OF A CONDOMINIUM OR COOPERATIVE; AND
(2) PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED BY A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION.
(C) (1) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE
THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(II) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
TIME–SHARE PROJECT AS DEFINED IN § 11A–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “DISPUTE” MEANS A DISAGREEMENT BETWEEN AT LEAST TWO
PARTIES THAT INVOLVES:
(I) THE AUTHORITY OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. REQUIRE OR PROHIBIT ANY ACTION INVOLVING A
UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
2. REQUIRE ANY PERSON TO PAY A FEE, A FINE, OR AN
ASSESSMENT;
3. SPEND COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY FUNDS; OR
4. ALTER OR ADD TO A COMMON ELEMENT; OR

HOUSE BILL 1529 3
(II) THE FAILURE OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY TO:
1. PROPERLY CONDUCT AN ELECTION;
2. GIVE ADEQUATE NOTICE OF A MEETING OR ANY
OTHER ACTION;
3. PROPERLY CONDUCT A MEETING;
4. PROPERLY ADOPT A BUDGET OR RULES;
5. MAINTAIN OR AUDIT BOOKS AND RECORDS;
6. ALLOW INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS;
7. MAINTAIN OR REPAIR A COMMON ELEMENT IF THE
FAILURE RESULTS IN SIGNIFICANT PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE; OR
8. EXERCISE ITS JUDGMENT IN GOOD FAITH
CONCERNING THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS AGAINST ANY
PERSON THAT IS SUBJECT TO THOSE DOCUMENTS.
(2) “DISPUTE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DISAGREEMENT THAT
INVOLVES:
(I) TITLE TO ANY UNIT OR COMMON ELEMENT;
(II) THE PERCENTAGE INTEREST OR VOTE ALLOCABLE TO A
UNIT;
(III) THE INTERPRETATION OR ENFORCEMENT OF ANY
WARRANTY;
(IV) THE COLLECTION OF AN ASSESSMENT VALIDLY LEVIED
AGAINST A PARTY; OR
(V) THE EXERCISE OF THE JUDGMENT OR DISCRETION OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY REGARDING ANY LEGALLY AUTHORIZED ACTION.
(E) “GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(1) THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF A CONDOMINIUM;

HOUSE BILL 1529
(2) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION;
(3) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, OR ANY
OTHER ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN INSTRUMENT
THAT IMPOSES ON LOTS, OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS, ANY
MANDATORY FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR
OTHERWISE FOR THE BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS; OR
(4) ANY OTHER BODY AUTHORIZED TO ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS GOVERNING A CONDOMINIUM, COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION, OR HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(F) (1) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” MEANS:
(I) THE MASTER DEED, DECLARATION, INCORPORATION
DOCUMENT, BYLAWS, OR RULES OF ANY COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(II) A WRITTEN PRIVATE AGREEMENT BETWEEN PARTIES
CONCERNING THE OPERATION OF THE COMMUNITY OR MAINTENANCE OR CONTROL
OF COMMON OR LIMITED COMMON PROPERTY; OR
(III) A DOCUMENT CONCERNING THE OPERATION OR
GOVERNANCE OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(2) “GOVERNING DOCUMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A LEASE UNLESS
THE LEASE PROVIDES THAT IT MAY BE ENFORCED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(G) “LOCAL COMMISSION” MEANS A LOCAL COMMISSION ON COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
(H) “OWNER” MEANS:
(1) A UNIT OWNER IN A CONDOMINIUM;
(2) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; OR
(3) A LOT OWNER IN A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
11C–102.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.

HOUSE BILL 1529 5
11C–103.
(A) A LOCAL COMMISSION ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT
SHALL COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE MEMBERS WHO:
1. ARE OWNERS IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
AND
2. REPRESENT PROFESSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS INVOLVED IN
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT OR REAL ESTATE SALES, DEVELOPERS, OR ATTORNEYS
WHO REPRESENT COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING AT LEAST ONE
MEMBER WHO IS A LICENSED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(II) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL DETERMINE THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS SHALL SERVE AS NONVOTING
MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION:
(I) A DESIGNEE OF THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE;
(II) A DESIGNEE OF THE COUNTY COUNCIL; AND
(III) A DESIGNEE OF A COUNTY AGENCY DEALING WITH:
1. PLANNING;
2. ENVIRONMENT;
3. PERMITTING;
4. TRANSPORTATION; OR
5. HOUSING AND COMMUNITY AFFAIRS.
(C) THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL BE
ELECTED FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERSHIP OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 1529
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY
EXECUTIVE SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE APPOINTMENT AND TERMS OF
MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY NOT SERVE MORE
THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
11C–104.
(A) A MAJORITY OF THE TOTAL MEMBERSHIP OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(B) THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST MONTHLY AND
DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS MEETINGS.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD COUNTY TRAVEL REGULATIONS.
(D) (1) THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) ADOPT RULES OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT AS
APPROPRIATE FOR MEMBERS AND STAFF;
(II) KEEP A RECORD OF ITS PROCEEDINGS;
(III) EXAMINE THE NEEDS OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(IV) ADVISE THE COUNTY COUNCIL, THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE
AND APPROPRIATE STATE AND COUNTY AGENCIES ON MATTERS RELATING TO
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(V) PROVIDE TRAINING ON THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE
LOCAL COMMISSION’S MEMBERS TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY BY:
1. DEVELOPING AN EDUCATIONAL CURRICULUM FOR
NEW MEMBERS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1529 7
2. APPROVING AN ALTERNATIVE EDUCATIONAL
CURRICULUM FOR NEW MEMBERS.
(2) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(I) EMPLOY STAFF AS AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY;
(II) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR RESOLVING DISCIPLINARY
MATTERS PENDING BEFORE THE LOCAL COMMISSION THROUGH NONJUDICIAL
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESSES;
(III) DEVELOP EDUCATIONAL AND TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES
FOR GOVERNING BODIES;
(IV) ADOPT ADDITIONAL BYLAWS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE BUSINESS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND
(V) ADOPT ANY ADDITIONAL REGULATIONS, PROCEDURES, OR
STANDARDS CONSISTENT WITH THE MISSION OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION TO CARRY
OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.
11C–105.
(A) THE LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
REQUIRE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY TO REGISTER WITH
THE LOCAL COMMISSION ANNUALLY ON A FORM THAT IDENTIFIES:
(1) THE ELECTED LEADERSHIP OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY; AND
(2) THE MANAGING AGENTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(B) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT FAILS TO REGISTER OR
MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT ON A REGISTRATION FORM IS INELIGIBLE TO FILE A
DISPUTE.
11C–106.
(A) LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE
THE COLLECTION OF A REASONABLE FEE FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 1529
(B) ANY AUTHORIZED FEE SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE COST OF
MAINTAINING THE LOCAL COMMISSION AND MAY INCLUDE:
(1) A PER–UNIT ANNUAL CHARGE TO COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITIES TO RENEW REGISTRATION;
(2) FEES FOR DISPUTE RESOLUTION UNDER § 11C–110 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, SERVICE, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE; AND
(3) A PER–UNIT CHARGE TO DEVELOPERS FOR THE RECORDATION OF
DOCUMENTS.
(C) IF THE COLLECTION OF A FEE BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION IS
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PUBLISH THE
FEE SCHEDULE.
11C–107.
IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ESTABLISHES A LOCAL COMMISSION, THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL DESIGNATE AN AGENCY OR AN OFFICE TO:
(1) DISSEMINATE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS REGARDING PROGRAMS
THAT ASSIST COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(2) CONDUCT EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS TO PROMOTE THE
OPERATION OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(3) MAINTAIN A LIST OF:
(I) COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY,
INCLUDING THE LEADERSHIP OF EACH COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(II) PROFESSIONAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES THAT PROVIDE
SERVICES TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY;
(4) MAINTAIN INFORMATION AND A REFERRAL SYSTEM FOR ALL
COUNTY SERVICES RELATED TO COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES;
(5) MAINTAIN A COLLECTION OF GOVERNING DOCUMENTS;
(6) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO GOVERNING BODIES ON
MATTERS INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1529 9
(I) LEADERSHIP TRANSITION;
(II) ELECTIONS;
(III) ADOPTION OF RULES;
(IV) ENFORCEMENT OF RULES;
(V) SELECTION OF ASSOCIATION MANAGERS; AND
(VI) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT;
(7) MAINTAIN AN OPERATIONS MANUAL TO GUIDE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY LEADERSHIP;
(8) ADVISE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES AND PROFESSIONAL
ASSOCIATION MANAGERS OF CHANGES IN THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS THAT
AFFECT THEIR COMMUNITIES OR OPERATIONS; AND
(9) OPERATE A DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS TO FURNISH
MEDIATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
11C–108. 11C–107.
(A) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY HEAR ANY DISPUTE BETWEEN PARTIES.
(B) A PARTY MAY NOT FILE A DISPUTE WITH THE LOCAL COMMISSION
UNTIL:
(1) THE THE PARTY HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO EXHAUST
ALL PROCEDURES AND REMEDIES PROVIDED BY THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF
THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) AT LEAST 60 DAYS AFTER ANY PROCEDURE OR REMEDY HAS BEEN
INITIATED WITH THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(C) (1) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
DETERMINES THAT A DISPUTE EXISTS, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL NOTIFY THE OTHER PARTIES OF THE OPTION TO
FILE THE DISPUTE WITH THE LOCAL COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 1529
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MAY NOT TAKE ACTION TO ENFORCE OR IMPLEMENT THE DECISION OF THE
GOVERNING BODY FOR 14 DAYS FOLLOWING NOTIFICATION OF ALL OTHER PARTIES.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11C–109 OF THIS TITLE, ON THE FILING OF
A DISPUTE WITH THE LOCAL COMMISSION, THE DECISION OF THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL BE STAYED AND MAY NOT BE
ENFORCED OR IMPLEMENTED, OTHER THAN BY FILING A CIVIL ACTION, UNTIL THE
COMPLETION OF THE DISPUTE PROCESS.
11C–109.
(A) (1) AT ANY TIME AFTER A DISPUTE IS FILED, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO LIFT AN
AUTOMATIC STAY UNDER § 11C–108 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IF A HEARING PANEL HAS NOT BEEN APPOINTED UNDER §
11C–112 OF THIS TITLE, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL AUTHORIZE A SPECIAL
STANDING PANEL TO CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR RELIEF FROM STAYS.
(3) THE SPECIAL PANEL SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THREE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMISSION
DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER §
11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED UNDER §
11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
THAT REQUESTS RELIEF FROM A STAY SHALL SERVE A COPY OF ITS REQUEST ON ANY
PARTY NAMED IN THE DISPUTE BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR PERSONAL SERVICE.
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE SHALL ACCOMPANY ANY REQUEST
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) A PARTY SERVED WITH A COPY OF THE REQUEST SHALL FILE ANY
OPPOSITION TO THE REQUEST WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING SERVICE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A REQUEST
FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY MAY BE GRANTED ONLY IF THE ASSIGNED PANEL FINDS
THAT:

HOUSE BILL 1529 11
(1) ENFORCING THE STAY WOULD RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(2) LIFTING THE STAY WILL NOT RESULT IN UNDUE HARM TO THE
RIGHTS OR INTERESTS OF ANY OPPOSING PARTY.
(D) IF A REQUEST FOR RELIEF FROM A STAY STATING FACTS SUFFICIENT TO
SHOW A NEED FOR IMMEDIATE ACTION IS NOT GRANTED OR DENIED WITHIN 20 DAYS
AFTER THE REQUEST WAS FILED, THE REQUEST SHALL BE DEEMED GRANTED.
11C–110.
(A) (1) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF A DISPUTE WITH THE LOCAL
COMMISSION, AN AGENCY DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY UNDER §
11C–107 OF THIS TITLE MAY INVESTIGATE FACTS AND ASSEMBLE DOCUMENTS
RELEVANT TO THE DISPUTE AND MAY PREPARE A SUMMARY OF THE ISSUES IN THE
DISPUTE FOR USE BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(2) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY A PARTY IF
THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT A DISPUTE WAS NOT PROPERLY
FILED.
(3) THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE MAY NOTIFY EACH PARTY
OF THE DISPUTE REGARDING POSSIBLE SANCTIONS UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) IF THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE FINDS THAT, ASSUMING ALL
FACTS ALLEGED BY THE PARTY THAT FILED THE DISPUTE ARE TRUE, THERE ARE NO
REASONABLE GROUNDS TO CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR
ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT HAS OCCURRED, THE DESIGNATED AGENCY OR OFFICE
SHALL INFORM THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF THE RESULTS OF AN INVESTIGATION BY A DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE, THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY:
(1) IF IT FINDS THAT THERE ARE NO REASONABLE GROUNDS TO
CONCLUDE THAT A VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW OR ANY GOVERNING DOCUMENT
HAS OCCURRED, DISMISS THE DISPUTE;
(2) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INVESTIGATION BY THE DESIGNATED
AGENCY OR OFFICE; OR
(3) SCHEDULE A HEARING ON THE DISPUTE.

HOUSE BILL 1529
(D) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY RECONSIDER THE DISMISSAL OF A
DISPUTE IF ANY PARTY FILES A MOTION TO RECONSIDER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
THE DISPUTE IS DISMISSED, DEMONSTRATING THAT:
(1) THE LOCAL COMMISSION ERRONEOUSLY INTERPRETED OR
APPLIED APPLICABLE LAW OR A GOVERNING DOCUMENT; OR
(2) MATERIAL ISSUES OF FACT THAT ARE NECESSARY TO A FAIR
RESOLUTION OF THE DISPUTE REMAIN UNRESOLVED.
11C–111.
(A) (1) ANY PARTY IN A DISPUTE MAY REQUEST MEDIATION.
(2) IF A PARTY REQUESTS MEDIATION, THE LOCAL COMMISSION
SHALL NOTIFY ALL PARTIES OF THE REQUEST AND OF THE MEDIATION SESSION.
(3) THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A QUALIFIED
MEDIATOR TO MEET WITH THE PARTIES WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A PARTY REQUESTS
MEDIATION TO ATTEMPT TO SETTLE THE DISPUTE.
(B) IF A PARTY REFUSES TO ATTEND A MEDIATION SESSION, OR IF
MEDIATION DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY RESOLVE THE DISPUTE WITHIN 10 DAYS
AFTER THE FIRST MEDIATION SESSION IS HELD, THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL
PROMPTLY SCHEDULE A HEARING.
11C–112.
(A) (1) IF A HEARING IS SCHEDULED, THE CHAIR OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE A PANEL TO HEAR THE DISPUTE.
(2) THE CHAIR SHALL SELECT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED
UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS TITLE AND AT LEAST ONE MEMBER DESCRIBED
UNDER § 11C–103(B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MEMBERS SELECTED BY THE CHAIR
SHALL DESIGNATE A THIRD MEMBER OF THE PANEL FROM A LIST OF VOLUNTEER
ARBITRATORS TRAINED OR EXPERIENCED IN COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
ISSUES MAINTAINED BY THE LOCAL COMMISSION.
(4) IF A SUITABLE ARBITRATOR IS NOT AVAILABLE, THE CHAIR OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL DESIGNATE:

HOUSE BILL 1529 13
(I) A THIRD PANELIST FROM AMONG THE VOTING MEMBERS OF
THE LOCAL COMMISSION; AND
(II) THE CHAIR OF THE PANEL.
(B) A PANELIST MAY NOT HAVE AN INTEREST IN THE DISPUTE TO BE HEARD.
(C) A HEARING PANEL SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON EACH DISPUTE THAT IS
NOT RESOLVED THROUGH MEDIATION UNDER § 11C–111 OF THIS TITLE UNLESS THE
LOCAL COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE DISPUTE IS:
(1) IDENTICAL TO ANOTHER DISPUTE BETWEEN THE SAME PARTIES
ON WHICH A HEARING HAS ALREADY BEEN HELD UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(2) CLEARLY NOT WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL
COMMISSION.
(D) THE LOCAL COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF A HEARING TO ALL
PARTIES NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS BEFORE A HEARING, UNLESS THE LOCAL
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT AN EXPEDITED HEARING IS NECESSARY, IN WHICH
CASE NOTICE SHALL BE PROVIDED TO ALL PARTIES AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE A
HEARING.
(E) A PARTY OR WITNESS MAY BE ADVISED BY COUNSEL AT A HEARING.
(F) IF A PARTY, AFTER PROPER NOTICE, DOES NOT APPEAR AT THE
SCHEDULED HEARING, THE HEARING PANEL MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF FOR ANOTHER
PARTY THAT THE FACTS ON RECORD WARRANT.
(G) (1) THE HEARING PANEL SHALL APPLY STATE AND COUNTY LAWS
AND ALL RELEVANT CASE LAW TO THE FACTS OF THE DISPUTE.
(2) A DECISION OF THE HEARING PANEL IS BINDING ON THE PARTIES.
(H) (1) THE LOCAL COMMISSION MAY ENFORCE A DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL BY APPROPRIATE LEGAL ACTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ENFORCEMENT ACTION, THE LOCAL
COMMISSION MAY:
(I) FILE FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO ENFORCE OR CORRECT
ANY VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1529
(II) FILE TO RECOVER DAMAGES FOR A LOSS SUSTAINED AS A
RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE.
(I) A HEARING PANEL MAY AWARD COSTS, INCLUDING REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES, TO ANY PARTY IF ANY OTHER PARTY:
(1) FILED OR MAINTAINED A FRIVOLOUS DISPUTE, OR FILED OR
MAINTAINED A DISPUTE IN BAD FAITH;
(2) REFUSED TO PARTICIPATE IN MEDIATION OF A DISPUTE; OR
(3) SUBSTANTIALLY DELAYED OR HINDERED THE DISPUTE
RESOLUTION PROCESS WITHOUT GOOD CAUSE.
(J) A HEARING PANEL MAY REQUIRE A LOSING PARTY IN A DISPUTE TO PAY
ALL OR PART OF ANY FILING FEE.
(K) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL HEARING PROCEDURES; AND
(2) ADOPT ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO WITNESSES
AND EVIDENCE FOR A HEARING.
11C–113.
(A) A PARTY MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A HEARING PANEL TO A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(B) AN APPEAL OF A DECISION SHALL BE CONSOLIDATED WITH ANY CASE
THAT ARISES OUT OF THE SAME FACTS.
(C) THE COURT HEARING AN APPEAL SHALL SUSTAIN THE DECISION OF THE
HEARING PANEL UNLESS THE DECISION IS:
(1) INCONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE LAW;
(2) LACKING SUBSTANTIAL EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ARBITRARY AND CAPRICIOUS.
11C–114.

HOUSE BILL 1529 15
(A) A PARTY MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION ARISING OUT OF A GOVERNING
DOCUMENT OR A LAW REGULATING THE POWERS OF A GOVERNING BODY OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) IF THE COURT IS NOTIFIED THAT A DISPUTE HAS BEEN FILED WITH THE
LOCAL COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE, THE COURT MAY POSTPONE
A PROCEEDING FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS.
(C) THE COURT MAY HEAR THE ACTION DE NOVO IF A HEARING PANEL
ASSIGNED TO THE DISPUTE HAS NOT ISSUED A DECISION UNDER § 11C–112 OF THIS
TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.